Hawaii statutes.
§54-29 Pensions. All officers and
employees of the board of water supply shall be entitled to the benefits of
part II of chapter 88. The employer's contribution to the retirement fund, as
provided thereunder, shall be paid from the funds under the control of the
board. [L 1961, c 155, pt of §1; Supp, §145A-19; HRS §54-29]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next